Utah statutes.
63A-4-207.   Records of risk management.
(1)  A record provided to the Division of Risk Management by any governmental
entity or political subdivision covered by the Risk Management Fund for the
purpose of risk control or claims activities of the division shall be
considered a record of the originating governmental entity or political
subdivision for purposes of Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access
and Management Act, if the originating governmental entity or political
subdivision retains a copy of the record.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection 63G-2-201(5), records may be exchanged between
the Division of Risk Management and any governmental entity or political
subdivision covered by the Risk Management Fund without meeting the
requirements of Section 63G-2-206, provided that they are used only for
purposes of risk control or claims activities.
